District of Columbia statutes.
48-853.10

Rules.

The Director, pursuant subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter, including the establishment of criteria for granting waivers to the reporting requirements set forth in this chapter.

History

Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-66, § 11, 61 DCR 7